Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Article 2. Nonprofit Private Institutions of Higher Education; Projects.

§ 23.1-1220.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Authority”
means the Virginia College Building Authority established in §

23.1-1200

.

“Bonds”
or

“revenue bonds”

means revenue bonds of the Authority issued under the provisions of this article, including revenue refunding bonds, notes, and other obligations that may be secured by a mortgage, the full faith and credit, or any other lawfully pledged security of a participating institution.

“Costs”
means (i) all or any part of the cost of construction, acquisition, alteration, enlargement, reconstruction, and remodeling of a project, including all lands, structures, real or personal property, rights, rights-of-way, air rights, franchises, easements, and interests acquired or used in connection with a project; (ii) the cost of demolishing or removing any building or structure on land acquired in connection with a project, including the cost of acquiring any lands to which such building or structure may be moved, the cost of all machinery and equipment, financing charges, interest prior to, during, and for a period after completion of such construction and acquisition, provisions for reserves for principal and interest, and provisions for extensions, enlargements, additions, replacements, renovations, and improvements; (iii) the cost of architectural, engineering, financial, and legal services, plans, specifications, studies, surveys, and estimates of cost and revenues; (iv) administrative expenses; (v) expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of constructing the project; and (vi) such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to constructing and acquiring the project, financing such construction, acquiring the project, and placing the project in operation.

“Participating institution”
means any (i) organization that is exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that is owned or controlled by a public institution of higher education or whose purpose is to support or otherwise benefit a public institution of higher education or (ii) nonprofit private institution of higher education in the Commonwealth whose primary purpose is to provide collegiate or graduate education and not to provide religious training or theological education that (a)(1) finances and constructs or (2) acquires a project or (b) refunds or refinances obligations, a mortgage, or advances as provided in this article.

“Project”
means a structure suitable for use as a dormitory or other multi-unit housing facility for students, faculty, officers, or employees, a dining hall, student union, administration building, academic building, library, laboratory, research facility, classroom, athletics facility, health care facility, maintenance, storage or utility facility, any related structure or facility, or any other structure or facility required or useful for instructing students, conducting research, or operating an institution of higher education, including parking facilities and other facilities or structures essential or convenient for the orderly conduct of such institution of higher education. “Project” includes landscaping, site preparation, furniture, equipment and machinery, and other similar items necessary or convenient for the intended use of a particular facility or structure. “Project” does not include books, fuel, supplies, or other items whose costs are customarily deemed to result in a current operating charge, any facility used for sectarian instruction or as a place of religious worship, or any facility used primarily in connection with any part of the program of a school or department of divinity for any religious denomination.

History.

1972, c. 686, § 23-30.41; 1973, c. 205; 2016, cc. 532, 588, 658.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2016, cc. 532 and
658 are identical, and amended former § 23-30.41, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to
§ 30-152 and Acts
2016, c. 588, cl. 4, the 2016 amendments by cc. 532 and 658 have been given effect in this section by inserting “any (i) organization that is exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to
§ 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that is owned or controlled by a public institution of higher education or whose purpose is to support or otherwise benefit a public institution of higher education or (ii)” in the definition of “Participating institution.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Colleges and Universities, § 7.

§ 23.1-1221.
Declaration of policy and purpose.

For the benefit of the people of the Commonwealth, the increase of their commerce, welfare, and prosperity, and the improvement of their health and living conditions, it is essential that (i) this and future generations of youth be given the fullest opportunity to learn and develop their intellectual and mental capacities and (ii) participating institutions be provided with appropriate additional means to assist such youth in achieving the required levels of learning and development of their intellectual and mental capacities.

The purpose of this article is to provide a measure of assistance and an alternative method to enable participating institutions to provide the facilities and structures that are sorely needed to accomplish the purposes of this article, all to the public benefit and good, to the extent and manner provided in this article.

History.

1972, c. 686, § 23-30.39; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1222.
Expenses of administering article.

All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this article shall be payable solely from funds provided under the provisions of this article, and no liability or obligation shall be incurred by the Authority pursuant to this article beyond the extent to which moneys have been provided under the provisions of this article.

History.

1972, c. 686, § 23-30.43; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1223.
Powers and duties of Authority.

The Authority shall assist participating institutions in the acquisition, construction, financing, and refinancing of projects.

The Authority may:

Determine the location and character of any project to be financed under the provisions of this article;

Construct, reconstruct, remodel, maintain, manage, enlarge, alter, add to, repair, operate, lease, as lessee or lessor, and regulate any project to be financed under the provisions of this article;

Enter into contracts for any purpose set forth in subdivision 2;

Enter into contracts for the management and operation of any project;

Issue bonds, bond anticipation notes, and other obligations of the Authority for any of its corporate purposes and fund or refund such bonds, bond anticipation notes, or other obligations as provided in this article;

Fix, revise, charge, and collect rates, rents, fees, and charges for the use of and for the services furnished by a project or any portion of a project;

Contract with any person, partnership, association, corporation, or other entity to fix, revise, charge, and collect rates, rents, fees, and charges pursuant to subdivision 9;

Designate a participating institution as its agent to take actions pursuant to subdivisions 1 through 4, 6, and 7;

Establish regulations for the use of a project or any portion of a project or designate a participating institution as its agent to establish regulations for the use of a project in which such institution is participating;

Employ consulting engineers, architects, attorneys, accountants, construction and financial experts, superintendents, managers, and such other employees and agents as it deems necessary and determine their compensation;

Receive and accept from any public agency loans or grants for or in aid of the construction of a project or any portion of a project;

Receive and accept from any source loans, grants, aid, or contributions of money, property, labor, or other things of value to be held, used, and applied only for the purposes for which such loans, grants, aid, and contributions are made;

Mortgage any project and the site of any project for the benefit of the holders of revenue bonds issued to finance such project;

Make loans to any participating institution for the cost of a project in accordance with an agreement between the Authority and such institution, but no such loan shall exceed the total cost of the project as determined by such institution and approved by the Authority;

Make loans to participating institutions to refund outstanding obligations, mortgages, or advances issued, made, or given by such participating institutions for the cost of a project;

Charge to and equitably apportion among participating institutions its administrative costs and expenses incurred in the exercise of the powers and duties conferred by this article; and

Do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this article.

In carrying out the purposes of this article, the Authority may undertake a joint project for two or more participating institutions, and all other provisions of this article shall apply to and for the benefit of the Authority and the institutions of higher education participating in such joint project.

History.

1972, c. 686, § 23-30.42; 2016, cc. 532, 588, 658.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2016, cc. 532 and
658 are identical, and amended former § 23-30.42, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to
§ 30-152 and Acts
2016, c. 588, cl. 4, the 2016 amendment by cc. 532 and 658 has been given effect in this section by substituting “participating institutions” for “institutions of higher education” in subsection A.

§ 23.1-1224.
Duties; conveyance of title to projects.

When (i)(a) the principal of and interest on revenue bonds of the Authority issued to finance the cost of a project for any participating institutions, including any revenue refunding bonds issued to refund and refinance such revenue bonds, have been fully paid and retired or (b) adequate provision has been made to fully pay and retire such bonds; (ii) all other conditions of the resolution or trust agreement authorizing and securing the same have been satisfied; and (iii) the lien of such resolution or trust agreement has been released in accordance with the provisions of such resolution or trust agreement, the Authority shall convey title to such project to such participating institution free and clear of all liens and encumbrances if title to such project is not yet vested in such participating institution.

History.

1972, c. 686, § 23-30.45; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1225.
Powers; acquisition of property.

The Authority may, directly or through a participating institution as its agent, acquire by (i) purchase solely from funds provided under the provisions of this article, (ii) gift, or (iii) devise, such lands, structures, property, real or personal, rights, rights-of-way, air rights, franchises, easements, and other interests in lands, including lands lying under water and riparian rights, that are located within the Commonwealth as it may deem necessary or convenient for the acquisition, construction, or operation of a project, upon such terms and at such prices as it deems reasonable and can be agreed upon between it and the owner of the property and take title to the property in the name of the Authority or any participating institution as its agent.

History.

1972, c. 686, § 23-30.44; 2016, c. 588; 2017, c. 314.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2017, c. 314, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall be effective retroactively to October 1, 2016.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 314, effective retroactively to October 1, 2016, substituted “provisions of this article” for “authority of this article.”

§ 23.1-1226.
Powers; issuance of negotiable notes.

The Authority may issue negotiable notes for any corporate purpose or renew any notes by the issuance of new notes, whether or not the notes to be renewed have matured. The Authority may issue notes partly to renew notes or to discharge other obligations then outstanding and partly for any other purpose. Such notes may be authorized, sold, executed, and delivered in the same manner as bonds. Any resolution authorizing notes or any issuance of notes by the Authority may contain any provision that the Authority may include in any resolution authorizing revenue bonds or any issuance of revenue bonds by the Authority, and the Authority may include in any note any term, covenant, or condition that it may include in any bond. All such notes are payable solely from the revenues of the Authority, subject only to any contractual rights of the holders of any of its notes or other obligations then outstanding.

History.

1972, c. 686, § 23-30.46; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1227.
Powers; issuance of revenue bonds.

The Authority may issue revenue bonds for any corporate purpose, and all such revenue bonds, notes, bond anticipation notes, or other obligations of the Authority issued pursuant to this article are negotiable for all purposes, notwithstanding their payment from a limited source and without regard to any other law.

In anticipation of the sale of such revenue bonds, the Authority may issue and renew negotiable bond anticipation notes, but the maximum maturity of any such note, including renewals, shall not exceed five years from the date on which the original note was issued. Such notes shall be paid from any revenues of the Authority available for such purpose and not otherwise pledged or from the proceeds of sale of the Authority’s revenue bonds issued in anticipation of such sale. Such notes shall be issued in the same manner as the revenue bonds. Such notes and the resolution authorizing such notes may contain any provisions, conditions, or limitations that the Authority may include in a bond resolution.

The revenue bonds and notes of every issue are payable solely out of revenues to the Authority, subject only to any agreement with (i) the holders of particular revenue bonds or notes to pledge any particular revenues or (ii) any participating institution.

Revenue bonds and notes are negotiable instruments that are subject only to the provisions of the revenue bonds and notes for registration but may be payable from a special fund.

Revenue bonds may be issued as serial bonds, term bonds, or both. Revenue bonds shall be authorized by resolution of the members of the Authority and bear such date, mature at such time, not exceeding 50 years from such date, bear interest at such rate or rates that is payable at such time, be in such denomination, be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such registration privileges, be executed in such manner, be payable in lawful United States currency at such place, and be subject to such terms of redemption as such resolution provides. Revenue bonds or notes may be sold at public or private sale for such price or prices as the Authority determines. Pending preparation of the definitive bonds, the Authority may issue interim receipts or certificates that shall be exchanged for such definitive bonds.

Any resolution authorizing revenue bonds or any issue of revenue bonds may contain provisions, which shall be a part of the contract with the holders of such revenue bonds, relating to:

Pledging all or any part of the revenues of a project, to any revenue-producing contract made by the Authority with any individual, partnership, corporation, association, or other public or private body to secure the payment of the revenue bonds or any particular issue of revenue bonds, subject to any existing agreements with bondholders;

Charging rentals, fees, and other charges and setting forth the amounts to be raised annually with such charges and the use and disposition of the revenues;

Establishing, setting aside, regulating, and disposing of reserves or sinking funds;

Limiting the right of the Authority or its agent to restrict and regulate the use of the project;

Limiting the purpose to which the proceeds of the sale of any issue of revenue bonds to be issued may be applied and pledging such proceeds to secure the payment of the revenue bonds or any issue of the revenue bonds;

Limiting the issuance of additional bonds, the terms upon which additional bonds may be issued and secured, and the refunding of outstanding bonds;

Establishing a procedure by which the terms of any contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated that includes the number of bondholders required to consent to such amendment or abrogation and the manner in which such consent may be given;

Limiting the amount of moneys derived from the project to be expended for operating, administrative, or other expenses of the Authority;

Defining the acts or omissions that constitute a default in the duties of the Authority to holders of its obligations and providing the rights and remedies of such holders in the event of a default;

Setting forth the duties, obligations, and liabilities of any trustee or paying agent; and

Mortgaging a project and the site of such project for the purpose of securing the bondholders.

Neither the members of the Authority nor any person executing revenue bonds or notes is liable personally on the revenue bonds or notes or is subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance of such revenue bonds or notes.

The Authority may purchase its bonds or notes with funds available for such purpose. The Authority may hold, pledge, cancel, or resell such bonds or notes subject to and in accordance with agreements with bondholders.

History.

1972, c. 686, § 23-30.47; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1228.
Powers; security for revenue bonds.

The Authority may secure any revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this article by a trust agreement between the Authority and a corporate trustee that may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or outside the Commonwealth. Such trust agreement or the resolution providing for the issuance of such revenue bonds may (i) pledge or assign the revenues to be received or proceeds of any contract pledged, (ii) convey or mortgage the project or any portion of the project, or (iii) contain provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders that the Authority deems reasonable and proper and are not in violation of law, including provisions that may be included in any resolution of the Authority authorizing revenue bonds pursuant to this article.

Any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of the Commonwealth that may act as depository of the proceeds of bonds, revenues, or other moneys may furnish such indemnifying bonds or pledge such securities as may be required by the Authority.

Any such trust agreement may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and the trustee and restrict the individual right of action by bondholders.

Any such trust agreement or resolution may contain such other provisions as the Authority deems reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders.

All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of such trust agreement or resolution may be treated as a part of the cost of the operation of a project.

History.

1972, c. 686, § 23-30.48; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1229.
Powers and duties; rates, rents, fees and charges; sinking fund.

The Authority may fix, revise, charge, and collect rates, rents, fees, and charges for the use of and the services furnished by each project and contract with any person, partnership, association, corporation, or other public or private body to perform such acts. The aggregate of such rates, rents, fees, and charges shall be fixed and adjusted to provide funds that, when combined with other revenues, is sufficient to (i) pay the uncovered cost of maintaining, repairing, and operating each portion of the project; (ii) pay the principal of and the interest on outstanding revenue bonds of the Authority as such principal and interest becomes due and payable; and (iii) create and maintain reserves required or provided for in any resolution authorizing, or trust agreement securing, such revenue bonds of the Authority. No such rate, rent, fee, or charge shall be subject to supervision or regulation by any department, commission, board, body, bureau, or agency of the Commonwealth other than the Authority.

The Authority shall set aside in a sinking fund or other similar fund a sufficient amount of the revenues derived from a project, except the part of such revenues that is necessary to pay the cost of maintenance, repair, and operation of the project, provide reserves, or make renewals, replacements, extensions, enlargements, and improvements as set forth in the resolution authorizing the issuance of any revenue bonds of the Authority or in the trust agreement securing such revenue bonds. The Authority shall pledge such sinking fund or other similar fund to pay the principal of and the interest on such revenue bonds as such principal and interest becomes due and the redemption or purchase price of bonds retired by call or purchase as provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of any revenue bonds of the Authority or in the trust agreement securing such revenue bonds. Such pledge is valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made. The rates, rents, fees, and charges and other revenues or moneys so pledged and received by the Authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery or further act. The lien of any such pledge is valid and binding against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the Authority, irrespective of whether such parties have notice of such lien. No resolution authorizing the issuance of any revenue bonds of the Authority or trust agreement by which a pledge is created need be filed or recorded except in the records of the Authority. The use and disposition of moneys to the credit of such sinking fund or other similar fund is subject to the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or of such trust agreement. Such sinking fund or other similar fund is a fund for all such revenue bonds issued to finance a project by a participating institution, without distinction or priority of one revenue bond over another, but the Authority may provide in any such resolution or trust agreement (i) that such sinking fund or other similar fund is the fund for a particular project by a participating institution and the revenue bonds issued to finance a particular project and (ii) for the issuance of revenue bonds having a subordinate lien to other revenue bonds of the Authority with respect to the security authorized and, in such case, the Authority may create separate or other similar funds with respect to such subordinate lien bonds.

History.

1972, c. 686, § 23-30.50; 2016, cc. 532, 588, 658.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2016, cc. 532 and
658 are identical, and amended former § 23-30.50, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to
§ 30-152 and Acts
2016, c. 588, cl. 4, the 2016 amendment by cc. 532 and 658 has been given effect in this section by substituting “finance a project by a participating institution” for “finance a project at a participating institution” and “by a participating institution” for “at an institution of higher education” in the last sentence

§ 23.1-1230.
Powers; issuance of refunding revenue bonds.

The Authority may provide for the issuance of revenue bonds to (i) refund any of its outstanding revenue bonds, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue on the earliest or any subsequent date of redemption, purchase, or maturity of such revenue bonds or (ii) pay all or any part of the cost of constructing and acquiring additions, improvements, extensions, or enlargements of a project or any portion of a project.

The Authority may (i) apply the proceeds of any revenue bonds issued to refund outstanding revenue bonds to purchase, retire at maturity, or redeem such outstanding revenue bonds either on their earliest or any subsequent redemption date, upon their purchase, or at their maturity and (ii) place the proceeds of revenue bonds issued to refund outstanding revenue bonds in escrow pending such application to be applied to such purchase, retirement, or redemption on the date that it determines.

The Authority may invest and reinvest proceeds placed in escrow pursuant to subsection B in direct obligations of the United States, certificates of deposit, or time deposits secured by direct obligations of the United States that mature at such time as is appropriate to ensure the prompt payment of principal, interest, and any redemption premium of the outstanding revenue bonds to be so refunded, pending the purchase, retirement at maturity, or redemption of such outstanding revenue bonds. The Authority may apply interest, income, and any profits earned or realized on any such investment to pay the outstanding revenue bonds to be so refunded. After the terms of the escrow have been fully satisfied and carried out, any balance of such proceeds and any interest, income, and profits earned or realized on the investments on such proceeds may be returned to the Authority for its lawful use.

The Authority may invest or reinvest the portion of the proceeds of any revenue bonds issued to pay all or any part of the cost of constructing and acquiring additions, improvements, extensions, or enlargements of a project in direct obligations of the United States or certificates of deposit or time deposits secured by direct obligations of the United States that mature not later than the time when such proceeds are needed to pay all or any part of such cost. The Authority may apply any interest, income, and profits earned or realized on such investment to the payment of all or any part of such cost or use such interest, income, and profits in any lawful manner.

All refunding revenue bonds issued pursuant to this section are subject to the provisions of this article in the same manner and to the same extent as other revenue bonds issued pursuant to this article.

History.

1972, c. 686, § 23-30.54; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1231.
Revenue bonds not obligations of Commonwealth or political subdivision.

Revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this article (i) do not constitute a debt, liability, or pledge of the faith and credit of the Commonwealth or any political subdivision of the Commonwealth and (ii) are payable solely from the funds provided from revenues as set forth in this article. Each such revenue bond shall state on its face that (a) neither the Commonwealth nor the Authority is obligated to pay such revenue bonds or the interest thereon except from revenues of the project or the portion of the project for which they are issued and (b) neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the Commonwealth or any political subdivision of the Commonwealth is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on such bonds. The issuance of revenue bonds under the provisions of this article shall not directly, indirectly, or contingently obligate the Commonwealth or any political subdivision of the Commonwealth to levy or pledge any form of taxation for such bonds or make any appropriation for their payment.

History.

1972, c. 686, § 23-30.49; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1232.
Moneys received deemed trust funds.

All moneys that the Authority receives pursuant to this article, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds or as revenues, are trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this article. Any officer with whom, or any bank or trust company with which, such moneys are deposited shall act as trustee of such moneys and shall hold and apply the same for the purposes of this article, the resolution authorizing the bonds of any issue, or the trust agreement securing such bonds.

History.

1972, c. 686, § 23-30.51; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1233.
Remedies of bondholders or holders of other obligations.

Any (i) holder of revenue bonds, notes, bond anticipation notes, other notes, or other obligations of the Authority issued under the provisions of this article or any of the coupons appertaining to any such obligation and (ii) trustee under any trust agreement, except to the extent that such rights are restricted by any resolution authorizing the issuance of, or any such trust agreement securing, such bonds or other obligations, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceedings, (a) protect and enforce all rights under the laws of the Commonwealth or such resolution or trust agreement and (b) enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this article or by such resolution or trust agreement to be performed by the Authority or any officer, employee, or agent of the Authority, including the fixing, charging, and collecting of the rates, rents, fees, and charges authorized by this article and required by the provisions of such resolution or trust agreement to be fixed, charged, and collected.

History.

1972, c. 686, § 23-30.52; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1234.
Exemption from taxation.

Neither the Authority nor its agent are required to pay any taxes or assessments upon or with respect to a project, any property acquired or used by the Authority or its agent under the provisions of this article, or the income from any such project or property. Any bonds issued under the provisions of this article, the transfer of such bonds, and the income from such bonds, including any profit made on the sale of such bonds, are exempt from taxation of any kind by the Commonwealth and the localities and other political subdivisions of the Commonwealth.

History.

1972, c. 686, § 23-30.53; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1235.
Bonds as legal investments.

Bonds issued by the Authority under the provisions of this article are securities (i) in which all public officers and bodies of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions, insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them and (ii) that may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any officer of the Commonwealth or any of its localities or any agency or political subdivision of the Commonwealth for any lawful purpose.

History.

1972, c. 686, § 23-30.55; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1236.
Nature of article.

This article is supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws, but the issuance of revenue bonds and revenue refunding bonds under the provisions of this article need not comply with the requirements of any other law applicable to the issuance of bonds. Except as otherwise expressly provided in this article, no power granted to the Authority under the provisions of this article is subject to the supervision or regulation of or requires the approval or consent of the Commonwealth, any locality or political subdivision of the Commonwealth, or any department, division, commission, board, body, bureau, official, or agency of any such locality or political subdivision.

History.

1972, c. 686, § 23-30.56; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1237.
Article liberally construed.

This article, being necessary for the welfare of the Commonwealth and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes of this article.

History.

1972, c. 686, § 23-30.57; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1238.
Article controls inconsistent laws.

To the extent that the provisions of this article are inconsistent with the provisions of any general statute or special act or parts thereof, the provisions of this article control.

History.

1972, c. 686, § 23-30.58; 1973, c. 205; 2015, c. 709; 2016, c. 588.